src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k42_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dagur
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dag
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: degi
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dags
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dagar
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dagar
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: døgum
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: daga
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dagurin
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dagin
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: degnum
    dagur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dagsins
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dagarnir
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dagarnar
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: døgunum
    dagur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: daganna
